incubator/apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="spyrryd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ushag__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="goa/yr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yr</l>
          <r>yr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>yr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cabb/yl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yl</l>
          <r>yl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>yl<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dorry/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="d/ooinney__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ooinney</l>
          <r>ooinney<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>einey</l>
          <r>ooinney<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sl/ieau__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieau</l>
          <r>ieau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eityn</l>
          <r>ieau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieyn</l>
          <r>ieau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/eyrrey__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eyrrey</l>
          <r>eyrrey<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irree</l>
          <r>eyrrey<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="baat/ey__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ey</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yn</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="usht/ey__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ey</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aghyn</l>
          <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/ayt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ayt</l>
          <r>ayt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iyt</l>
          <r>ayt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="/mie__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mie</l>
          <r>mie<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>share</l>
          <r>mie<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/olk__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olk</l>
          <r>olk<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smessey</l>
          <r>olk<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/beg__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>beg</l>
          <r>beg<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sloo</l>
          <r>beg<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/mooar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mooar</l>
          <r>mooar<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smoo</l>
          <r>mooar<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ymmodee__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ymmodee</l>
          <r>ymmodee<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>slee</l>
          <r>ymmodee<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/mennick__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mennick</l>
          <r>mennick<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smenkey</l>
          <r>mennick<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/faggys__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faggys</l>
          <r>faggys<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sniessey</l>
          <r>faggys<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/leah__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leah</l>
          <r>leah<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sleaie</l>
          <r>leah<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/foddey__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>foddey</l>
          <r>foddey<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sodjey</l>
          <r>foddey<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/lhean__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lhean</l>
          <r>lhean<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>shlea</l>
          <r>lhean<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/aeg__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aeg</l>
          <r>aeg<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saa</l>
          <r>aeg<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/shenn__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>shenn</l>
          <r>shenn<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>shinney</l>
          <r>shenn<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/lajer__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lajer</l>
          <r>lajer<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stroshey</l>
          <r>lajer<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/trome__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>trome</l>
          <r>trome<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>strimmey</l>
          <r>trome<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ard__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ard</l>
          <r>ard<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>syrjey</l>
          <r>ard<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/aashagh__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aashagh</l>
          <r>aashagh<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sassey</l>
          <r>aashagh<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lioar"><i>lioar</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abane"><i>abane</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agglish"><i>agglish</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aker"><i>aker</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arg"><i>arg</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="armee"><i>armee</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arn"><i>arn</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arroogh"><i>arroogh</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ashoon"><i>ashoon</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="askaid"><i>askaid</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="assag"><i>assag</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ass-laynt"><i>ass-laynt</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="assyl"><i>assyl</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awin"><i>awin</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awnse"><i>awnse</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awree"><i>awree</i><par n="ushag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aall"><i>aall</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aanirit"><i>aanirit</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aase"><i>aase</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agglaghin"><i>agglaghin</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aggle"><i>aggle</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aght"><i>aght</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aile"><i>aile</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainle"><i>ainle</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altar"><i>altar</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anchaslys"><i>anchaslys</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anfirrinnys"><i>anfirrinnys</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angaaish"><i>angaaish</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="annoonid"><i>annoonid</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ansoor"><i>ansoor</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="argid"><i>argid</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arraneyder"><i>arraneyder</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arrane"><i>arrane</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arroo"><i>arroo</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aspick"><i>aspick</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="assee"><i>assee</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="att"><i>att</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awnssal"><i>awnssal</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ayrn"><i>ayrn</i><par n="spyrryd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mie"><i/><par n="/mie__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="olk"><i/><par n="/olk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beg"><i/><par n="/beg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mooar"><i/><par n="/mooar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ymmodee"><i/><par n="/ymmodee__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mennick"><i/><par n="/mennick__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="faggys"><i/><par n="/faggys__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="leah"><i/><par n="/leah__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="foddey"><i/><par n="/foddey__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lhean"><i/><par n="/lhean__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aeg"><i/><par n="/aeg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="shenn"><i/><par n="/shenn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lajer"><i/><par n="/lajer__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trome"><i/><par n="/trome__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ard"><i/><par n="/ard__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aashagh"><i/><par n="/aashagh__adj"/></e>
